District of Columbia statutes.
10-503.17

Parades, assemblages, and displays forbidden.

It is forbidden to parade, stand, or move in processions or assemblages in said United States Capitol Grounds, or to display therein any flag, banner, or device designed or adapted to bring into public notice any party, organization, or movement, except as hereinafter provided in §§ 10-503.22 and 10-503.23.

History

July 31, 1946, 60 Stat. 719, ch. 707, § 7

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-503.18 and § 10-503.23.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-113.
1973 Ed., § 9-124.